Tennessee, session 114, SB0285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 35-5-117(c), is amended by deleting
the language "a preponderance of the evidence" and substituting "clear and convincing
evidence".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0285
001719
- 1 -